Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2065
Internationally trained physician; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 38-2065 to 38-2071:

(1) Assessment and evaluation program means a structured program approved by the department, with the recommendation of the board, which utilizes multiple assessment methods to evaluate an internationally trained physician's performance over time across the general competencies within the physician's intended scope of practice;

(2) General competencies means the six domains of professional competence endorsed by the Coalition for Physician Accountability, including patient care and procedural skills, medical knowledge, practice-based learning and improvement, interpersonal and communication skills, professionalism, and systems-based practice;

(3) Health profession shortage area means a geographic region of the state that has been designated by the Nebraska Rural Health Advisory Commission pursuant to section 71-5665;

(4) Internationally trained physician means a physician who has: (a) Received a degree of doctor of medicine or its equivalent from a legally chartered medical school outside the United States; (b) completed a graduate medical education training program that is substantially similar to United States graduate medical education or residency, as determined by the board; (c) been licensed or otherwise authorized to practice medicine in a country other than the United States; (d) practiced medicine for at least three of the last five years following the completion of a graduate medical education training program, unless that period is waived by the board; and (e) been in good standing with any previous medical licensing or regulatory institution during the most recent three years of practice and has no pending discipline before the licensing or regulatory institution;

(5) Legally chartered medical school outside the United States means a medical school recognized by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates that provides individuals with a medical education or training outside the United States that is substantially similar to the training required to qualify to practice medicine and surgery in this state, as determined by the board;

(6) Licensing examination means the United States Medical Licensing Examination;

(7) Participating health care entity means a federally qualified health center, hospital, or other entity that provides an assessment and evaluation program and is approved by the department, with the recommendation of the board. The department, with the recommendation of the board, may establish additional criteria for qualification as a participating health care entity including criteria relating to the ability to implement a board-recommended assessment and evaluation program addressing the general competencies;

(8) Provisional license means a license to practice medicine issued pursuant to section 38-2066; and

(9) Transitional license means a license issued pursuant to section 38-2067 that permits an internationally trained physician to practice as a practitioner in a health profession shortage area independently without the supervision of a participating health care entity.

Laws 2026, LB1212, § 3.
August 1, 2027